Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall distribute  moneys
to the Area Health Education Center program of Oregon Health and  Science University for
the purpose of supporting the Oregon Academy of Family Physicians. The  moneys may be
used by the academy for promoting this state’s family  medicine residency training programs,
increasing training  for residents in maternal and reproductive health care and developing
programming for family medicine residency training program directors,  faculty and resi-
dents.
(2) The Area Health Education Center program may withhold from the moneys distrib-
uted under subsection (1) of this section up to five percent of the  moneys in order to reim-
burse the program for administrative costs incurred under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000 for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 490 (SB 490-B) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 490 (SB 490-B) Page 2